North Carolina, session 2025, HB306.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding G.S. 66-58, G.S. 115C-518, Article 12 of Chapter
160A of the General Statutes, or any other provision of law, the Towns of Blowing Rock and
Boone, Watauga County, and the Watauga County Board of Education (hereinafter "local
government unit") are authorized to do all of the following:
(1) Either separately or through a partnership, joint venture, land trust, or other
similar entity, construct and provide affordable housing for local government
unit employees on property owned by the unit.
(2) Convey property owned by the local government unit to a partnership, joint
venture, land trust, or similar entity for the purpose of constructing, providing,
or maintaining affordable housing for unit employees. A unit shall not convey
to a partnership, joint venture, land trust, or any other entity any property that
was acquired through the exercise of eminent domain on or after the date this
act becomes law.
(3) Contract with any person, partnership, corporation, or other business entity to
finance, construct, or maintain affordable housing for local government unit
employees.
(4) Rent or sell affordable housing units for residential use exclusively to local
government unit employees. A unit may establish reasonable rents or sales
prices, charge below-market rates, offer below-market financing, and place
reasonable restrictions and buyback provisions on the resale of the affordable
housing units.
SECTION 2. Any affordable housing units constructed pursuant to the provisions of
this act shall comply with all applicable building codes, zoning ordinances, and any other State
and local regulations related to the construction of residential homes.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H306-v-1*